Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-3534
Practice of geology; restrictions.

Except as provided in sections 81-3541 and 81-3548, an individual shall not directly or indirectly engage in the practice of geology in the state or use the title Professional Geologist or display or use any words, letters, figures, titles, sign, card, advertisement, or other symbol or device indicating or tending to indicate that such individual is a professional geologist or a licensee or is practicing geology unless such individual is licensed under the Geologists Regulation Act. A professional geologist or licensee shall not aid or abet any person not licensed under the act in the practice of geology.

Laws 1998, LB 1161, § 81;

Laws 2025, LB38, § 27.